Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4902
Discharge or discipline for being named in Brady-Giglio disclosure; prohibited.

(1) An officer shall not be discharged, disciplined, or threatened with discharge or discipline, or subject to revocation or suspension of a certificate under sections 81-1401 to 81-1414.19, solely because a prosecuting agency has:

(a) Named the officer in a Brady-Giglio disclosure or determined that such officer may be subject to such disclosure; or

(b) Disclosed to any person that the officer is named in a Brady-Giglio disclosure.

(2) This section does not prohibit a dismissal, a suspension, a demotion, or any other disciplinary action against an officer, or against a certificate issued under sections 81-1401 to 81-1414.19, based on the underlying action that resulted in such officer being named in a Brady-Giglio disclosure or being considered for such disclosure.

Laws 2026, LB965, § 23.
October 1, 2026